test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-vieqddw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - vieʼddõ: # Verb 24 'eng /est vedada/fin' - full paradigm
     vieʼddõ+V+Inf: [vieʼddõ, vieddõ]
     vieʼddõ+V+Ger: [vieʼddõs, vieddõs]
     vieʼddõ+V+Sup: viedām
     vieʼddõ+V+Sup+Ine: viedāmõs
     vieʼddõ+V+Sup+Ela: viedāmõst
     vieʼddõ+V+Sup+Tra: viedāmõks
     vieʼddõ+V+Sup+Abe: viedāmõt
     vieʼddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viedāb
     vieʼddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viedāt
     vieʼddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viedābõd
     vieʼddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viedīz
     vieʼddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [viedīzt, viedīztõ]
     vieʼddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [viedīzt, viedīztõ]
     vieʼddõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [vieʼd, vied]
     vieʼddõ+V+Cond+Sg3: viedāks
     vieʼddõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: viedā
     vieʼddõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [vieʼddõ, vieddõ]
     vieʼddõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: viedāgid
     vieʼddõ+V+Jus+Sg3: viedāg
     vieʼddõ+V+QuoSg3: viedāji
     vieʼddõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [vieʼddõn, vieddõn]
     vieʼddõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [vieʼdtõd, viedtõd]
